test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_ceve_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - čeve: # 2B
    čeve+N+Sg+Nom: čeṿe
    čeve+N+Sg+Gen: čiäpˊpát
    čeve+N+Sg+Acc: čiäpˊpát
    čeve+N+Sg+Ill: čiäˊpáttân
    čeve+N+Sg+Loc: čiäˊpáttist
    čeve+N+Sg+Com: čiäˊpáttáin
    čeve+N+Sg+Abe: čiäpˊpáttáá
    čeve+N+Ess: [čevveen, čiäˊpáttin]
    čeve+N+Par: [čevveed, čiäˊpáttid]
    čeve+N+Pl+Nom: čiäˊpátteh
    čeve+N+Pl+Gen: čiäˊpáttij
    čeve+N+Pl+Acc: čiäˊpáttijd
    čeve+N+Pl+Ill: čiäˊpáttáid
    čeve+N+Pl+Loc: čiäˊpáttijn
    čeve+N+Pl+Com: čiäˊpáttijguin
    čeve+N+Pl+Abe: čiäˊpáttijttáá

    
    
